District of Columbia statutes.
32-856

Requirement of District notice.

A request for proposals or invitation to bid or similar document regarding a District development project covered by this chapter shall include a summary description of and reference to the requirements of this chapter. Failure to include a description or reference to this chapter in the document shall not exempt an employer otherwise subject to the requirements of this chapter.

Apr. 2, 2003, D.C. Law 14-266, § 7, 50 DCR 412